Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.43, subdivision 5a, is amended to read: Subd. 5a. Limitation on disclosure of certain personnel data. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the following data relating to employees of a secure treatment facility defined in section 253B.02, subdivision 18a,new text begin or 253D.02, subdivision 13; employees of a treatment program as defined in section 253D.02, subdivision 17;new text end employees of a state correctional facilitydeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end or employees of the Department of Corrections directly involved in supervision of offenders in the communitydeleted text begin , shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end not be disclosed to facility patientsnew text begin or clientsnew text end , corrections inmates, or other individuals who facility or correction administrators reasonably believe will use the information to harass, intimidate, or assault any of these employees: new text begin (1)new text end place where previous education or training occurred; new text begin (2)new text end place of prior employment; and new text begin (3)new text end payroll timesheets or other comparable data, to the extent that disclosure of payroll timesheets or other comparable data may disclose future work assignments, home address or telephone number, the location of an employee during nonwork hours, or the location of an employee's immediate family members. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to any data request pending on or received after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 253B.03, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Correspondence. A patient has the right to correspond freely without censorshipnew text begin , subject to section 253B.25new text end . The head of the treatment facility or head of the state-operated treatment program may restrict correspondence if the patient's medical welfare requires this restriction. For a patient in a state-operated treatment program, that determination may be reviewed by the executive board. Any limitation imposed on the exercise of a patient's correspondence rights and the reason for it shall be made a part of the clinical record of the patient. Any communication which is not delivered to a patient shall be immediately returned to the sender. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 253B.03, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Visitors and phone calls. Subject to the general rules of the treatment facility or state-operated treatment programnew text begin and section 253B.25new text end , a patient has the right to receive visitors and make phone calls. The head of the treatment facility or head of the state-operated treatment program may restrict visits and phone calls on determining that the medical welfare of the patient requires it. Any limitation imposed on the exercise of the patient's visitation and phone call rights and the reason for it shall be made a part of the clinical record of the patient. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [253B.25] PATIENT ACCESS TO INFORMATION ON FACILITY EMPLOYEES. new text end new text begin The head of a treatment facility or state-operated treatment program may restrict patient access to correspondence and telephone calls that the head of the treatment facility or state-operated treatment program reasonably believes will be used to harass, intimidate, or assault employees of the treatment facility or state-operated treatment program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 253D.19, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Limited rights. The executive board may limit the statutory rights described in subdivision 2 for persons committed to the Minnesota Sex Offender Program under this chapter or with the executive board's consent under section 246C.13. The statutory rights described in subdivision 2 may be limited only as necessary to maintain a therapeutic environment or the security of the facility or to protect the safety and well-being of committed persons, staff, and the public.new text begin Protection of staff from harassment, intimidation, or assault is a basis for limiting the statutory rights described in subdivision 2.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end